hu: Aljszőr eltávolító eszköz típusa: Penge; Tömb; Fésű; Vakaró; Kesztyű; Gereblye; Gumikefe; Kaparó; Kő; Dróthurok; Egyéb
lt-LT: Šėrimosi šalinimo įrankio tipas: Ašmenys; Blokas; Šukos; Grandyklė; Pirštinė; Grėbliukas; Guminis šepetys; Grandiklis; Akmuo; Vielinė kilpa; Kita
sv: Avskärningsverktygstyp: Blad; Block; Kam; Ryktskrapa; Handske; Kratta; Gummiborste; Skrapa; Sten; Trådögla; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tipul sculei pentru îndepărtarea părului în exces: Lamă; Bloc; Pieptene; Tesală; Mănușă; Greblă; Perie din cauciuc; Răzuitor; Piatră; Buclă din sârmă; Altele
ko: 털 제거 도구 유형: 블레이드; 블록; 빗; 커리; 장갑; 갈퀴; 고무 브러시; 스크레이퍼; 스톤; 와이어 루프; 기타
en: Deshedder tool type: Blade; Block; Comb; Curry; Glove; Rake; Rubber brush; Scraper; Stone; Wire loop; Other
tr: Tüy toplama aleti tipi: Bıçak; Blok; Tarak; Kaşağı; Eldiven; Tırmık; Kauçuk fırça; Sıyırıcı; Taş; Tel halka; Diğer
nb: Verktøytype for avskjæring: Blad; Blokk; Kam; Striglekam; Hanske; Rive; Gummibørste; Skrape; Stein; Trådløkke; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de ferramenta de remoção de pelos: Lâmina; Bloco; Pente; Almofaça; Luva; Ancinho; Escova de borracha; Raspador; Pedra; Laço de arame; Outro
da: Deshedder-værktøjstype: Klinge; Blok; Kam; Strigle; Handske; Rive; Gummibørste; Skraber; Sten; Trådløkke; Andet
de: Art des Fellpflegewerkzeugs: Klinge; Block; Kamm; Striegel; Handschuh; Harke; Gummibürste; Schaber; Stein; Drahtschlaufe; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип инструмент за разресване на подкосъм: Острие; Блокче; Гребен; Четка за чесане; Ръкавица; Гребло; Гумена четка; Стъргалка; Камък; Телена примка; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta alata za uklanjanje ljuski: Oštrica; Blok; Češalj; Četka za timarenje; Rukavica; Grablje; Gumena četka; Strugalica; Kamen; Žičana petlja; Ostalo
it: Tipo di strumento Deshedder: Lama; Blocco; Pettine; Striglia; Guanto; Rastrello; Spazzola in gomma; Raschietto; Pietra; Ad anello in metallo; Altro
sk-SK: Typ nástroja na odstraňovanie chlpov: Čepeľ; Blok; Hrebeň; Žbilko; Rukavica; Hrable; Gumená kefa; Škrabka; Kameň; Drôtená slučka; Iné
zh-TW: 除毛工具類型: 刀片式; 磚塊式; 梳子式; 橡膠軟梳; 手套式; 耙梳式; 橡膠刷; 刮毛刀; 除毛石; 金屬圈刷; 其他
zh-CN: 去毛器工具类型: 刀片; 块状; 梳子; 橡胶马梳; 手套; 耙子; 橡胶刷; 刮板; 浮石; 钢丝环; 其他
fi: Karvaharjatyyppi: Terä; Palikka; Kampa; Kumisuka; Käsine; Hara; Kumiharja; Kaavin; Kivi; Metallilankalenkki; Muu
ru: Тип дешеддера: Лезвие; Блок; Расческа; Скребница; Перчатка; Грабли; Резиновая щетка; Скребок; Камень; Проволочная петля; Другое
cs: Typ nástroje pro odstraňování chlupů: Čepel; Blok; Hřeben; Hřbílko; Rukavice; Hrablo; Gumový kartáč; Škrabka; Kámen; Drátěná smyčka; Jiné
el: Τύπος εργαλείου αφαίρεσης νεκρής τρίχας: Λεπίδα; Μπλοκ; Χτένα; Στλεγγίδα; Γάντι; Τσουγκράνα; Βούρτσα από καουτσούκ; Ξύστρα; Πέτρα; Συρμάτινος βρόχος; Άλλο
es: Tipo de herramienta quitapelaje: Cuchilla; Bloque; Peine; Rasqueta; Guante; Rastrillo; Cepillo de goma; Raspador; Piedra; Bucle de alambre; Otro
fr: Type d’outil de débourrage: Lame; Bloc; Peigne; Étrille; Gant; Râteau; Brosse en caoutchouc; Grattoir; Pierre; Boucle métallique; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de ferramenta de remoção de pelos: Lâmina; Bloco; Pente; Almofaça; Luva; Ancinho; Escova de borracha; Raspador; Pedra; Laço de arame; Outro
vi: Loại dụng cụ loại bỏ lông rụng: Lưỡi; Khối; Lược; Lược Curry; Găng tay; Lược cào; Bàn chải cao su; Dụng cụ cạo; Đá; Vòng dây; Khác
pl: Typ narzędzia do usuwania podszerstka: Ostrze; Kostka; Grzebień; Zgrzebło; Rękawica; Grabie; Gumowa szczotka; Skrobak; Kamień; Pętla z drutu; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta orodja za odstranjevanje dlak: Rezilo; Blok; Glavnik; Curry krtača; Rokavica; Grablje; Gumijasta krtača; Strgalo; Kamen; Žičnata zanka; Drugo
ja: 脱シェダーツールタイプ: ブレード; ブロック; コーム; カリー; グローブ; レーキ; ラバーブラシ; スクレーパー; ストーン; ワイヤーループ; その他
nl: Vachtverzorginghulpmiddel type: Mes; Blok; Kam; Roskam; Handschoen; Hark; Rubberen borstel; Schraper; Steen; Draadlus; Overige
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์แปรงขนร่วง: ใบมีด; บล็อก; หวี; แปรงขูดขน; ถุงมือ; คราด; แปรงยาง; ที่ขูด; หิน; ห่วงลวด; อื่นๆ